Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS

[§521-1] Short title. This chapter
shall be known and may be cited as the Residential Landlord-Tenant Code. [L
1972, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next